Utah statutes.
41-1a-1310.   Class B misdemeanors.
It is a class B misdemeanor for any person to:
(1)  fail to properly endorse and deliver a valid certificate of title to a
vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor to a transferee or owner lawfully entitled
to it in accordance with Section 41-1a-702, except as provided for under
Sections 41-3-301, 41-1a-519, and 41-1a-709;
(2)  fail to give an odometer disclosure statement to the transferee as
required by Section 41-1a-902;
(3)  operate, or cause to be operated, a motor vehicle knowing that the
odometer is disconnected or nonfunctional, except while moving the motor
vehicle to a place of repair;
(4)  offer for sale, sell, use, or install on any part of a motor vehicle or
on an odometer in a motor vehicle any device that causes the odometer to
register miles or kilometers other than the true miles or kilometers driven as
registered by the odometer within the manufacturer's designed tolerance;
(5)  fail to adjust an odometer or affix a notice as required by Section
41-1a-906 regarding the adjustment;
(6)  remove, alter, or cause to be removed or altered any notice of adjustment
affixed to a motor vehicle as required by Section 41-1a-906;
(7)  fail to record the odometer reading on the certificate of title at the
time of transfer; or
(8)  accept or give an incomplete odometer statement when an odometer
statement is required under Section 41-1a-902.
